Maine, session 132, LD952.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §850-A, sub-§13, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7,
is amended to read:
13. Employee. "Employee" means a person who may be permitted, required or
directed by an employer in consideration of direct or indirect gain or profit to engage in
any employment in the State but does not include an independent contractor or any
individual employed in agriculture, as described in the Employment Security Law and the
Federal Unemployment Tax Act, 26 United States Code, Section 3311.
Sec. 2. 26 MRSA §850-A, sub-§14, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. AAA, §7,
is amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
"Employer" does not include the Federal Government or any person, sole proprietorship,
partnership, corporation, association or other business entity that employs individuals in
agriculture, as described in the Employment Security Law and the Federal Unemployment
Tax Act, 26 United States Code, Section 3311, in this State.
Sec. 3. Department of Labor to refund contributions made by employers
and self-employed individuals under law. The Department of Labor shall refund to
an employer of individuals in agriculture, as described in the Employment Security Law
and the Federal Unemployment Tax Act, contributions made by the employer to the
Department of Labor pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 26, section 850-F. An
employer that deducted a portion of the premium required for an employee from that
employee's wages shall remit that portion of the premium to the employee as part of the
employee's wage.
Sec. 4. Retroactivity. Those sections of this Act that amend the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 26, section 850-A, subsections 13 and 14 apply retroactively to October 25,
2023.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR2312(01)